Washington statutes.
RCW 2.53.020

Office of civil legal aid—Director's duties.

(1) There is created an office of civil legal aid as an independent agency of the judicial branch.

(2) Activities of the office of civil legal aid shall be carried out by a director of civil legal aid services. The director of civil legal aid services shall be appointed by the supreme court from a list of three names forwarded by the access to justice board. Qualifications for the director include admission to practice law in this state for at least five years; experience in representation of low-income people in civil matters, which experience may be in the form of volunteer representation; knowledge of and demonstrated commitment to promoting access to the civil justice system for indigent persons; and proven managerial or supervisory experience. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the supreme court and receive a salary to be fixed by the oversight committee.

(3) The director shall:

(a) Contract with one or more qualified legal aid providers to provide civil legal aid services authorized by RCW 2.53.030;

(b) Monitor and oversee the use of state funding to ensure compliance with this chapter;

(c) Report quarterly to the civil legal aid oversight committee established in RCW 2.53.010 and the supreme court's access to justice board on the use of state funds for legal aid; periodically assess the most prevalent civil legal problems experienced by low-income people in Washington state and the capacity of the state-funded legal aid system to meet the legal needs arising from such problems; and report biennially on the status of access to the civil justice system for low-income people eligible for state-funded legal aid; and

(d) Submit budget requests.

(4) The office shall not provide direct representation of clients.

[ 2018 c 21 s 1; 2005 c 105 s 5.]